Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-1923, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 197, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1-1923), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1-1923. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue


until July 1, 2025 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the


Oklahoma Sunset Law, a Long-Term Care Facility Advisory Council


which shall be composed as follows:


1. The Governor shall appoint a thirteen-member Long-Term Care


Facility Advisory Council which shall advise the State Commissioner


of Health. The Advisory Council shall be comprised of the following


persons:



Req. No. 10606 Page 1


a. one representative from the Oklahoma Health Care


Authority, designated by the Administrator,


b. one representative from the Department of Mental


Health and Substance Abuse Services, designated by the


Commissioner of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services,


c. one representative from the Department of Human


Services, designated by the Director of Human


Services,


d. one member who shall be a licensed general


practitioner of the medical or osteopathic profession,


e. one member who shall be a registered pharmacist,


f. one member who shall be a licensed registered nurse or


licensed practical nurse,


g. one member who shall be an operator-administrator of a


nursing home which has a current license issued


pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act and who shall


have had five (5) years' experience in the nursing


home profession as an operator-administrator,


h. one member who shall be an operator-administrator of a


residential care home licensed pursuant to the


provisions of the Residential Care Act,





Req. No. 10606 Page 2


i. one member who shall be an owner-operator of an adult


day care facility licensed pursuant to the provisions


of the Adult Day Care Act,


j. one member who shall be an owner-operator of a


continuum of care facility or assisted living center


licensed pursuant to the provisions of the Continuum


of Care and Assisted Living Act,


k. two members who shall be over the age of sixty-five


(65) who shall represent the general public and have


no long-term care professional work history, and


l. one member who shall be over the age of sixty-five


(65) who shall represent the general public and who


advocates for individuals receiving long-term care


services; and


2. Appointments shall be for two-year terms. Members shall


serve at the pleasure of their designators. Members may be


reappointed not to exceed two terms. In case of a vacancy, the


Governor shall appoint individuals to fill the remainder of the


term.


B. The State Department of Health shall provide administrative


support to perform designated duties of the Advisory Council. The


Department shall also provide space for meetings of the Advisory


Council.



Req. No. 10606 Page 3


C. The Advisory Council shall annually elect a chair, vice-


chair and secretary-treasurer, shall meet at least quarterly, and


may hold such special meetings as may be necessary. The members of


the Advisory Council shall be reimbursed as provided for by the


State Travel Reimbursement Act.


D. The Advisory Council shall have the power and duty to:


1. Serve as an advisory body to the Department for the


development and improvement of services to and care and treatment of


residents of facilities subject to the provisions of the Nursing


Home Care Act, homes subject to the provisions of the Residential


Care Act and facilities subject to the provisions of the Adult Day


Care Act;


2. Review and make recommendations regarding quality of


services, care, and treatment provided to individuals receiving


services from entities that are subject to the Nursing Home Care


Act, the Residential Care Act and the Adult Day Care Act; and


3. Evaluate and review the standards, practices, and procedures


regarding the administration and enforcement of the provisions of


the Nursing Home Care Act, the Residential Care Act and the Adult


Day Care Act.




60-1-10606 SW 12/04/24





Req. No. 10606 Page 4